apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="stik__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~ket / ~ / ~kene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="blik__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~ket / ~ke / ~kene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="egern__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~ene | (~erne) -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erne</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/and__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~and / ~anden / ~ænder / ~ænderne -->
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anden</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ænder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ænderne</l>   <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hjem__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~met / ~ / ~mene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sadisme__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/arn__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~arn / ~arnet / ~ørn / ~ørnene -->
  <e>       <p><l>arn</l>       <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arnet</l>     <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørn</l>       <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørnene</l>    <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="søn__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~nen / ~ner / ~nerne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nerne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aft/en__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~nen | (~enen) / ~ner | ( ~ener) / ~nerne  | (~enerne) -->
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>enen</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ener</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nerne</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>enerne</l>    <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sodavand__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ | (~er) / ~ene | (~erne) -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erne</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="skib__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~e / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cover__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~e / ~ne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="blod__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mørke__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~t / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="cover">           <i>cover</i><par n="cover__n"/></e>
<e lm="aften">           <i>aft</i><par n="aft/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="and">             <i></i><par n="/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="ateisme">         <i>ateisme</i><par n="sadisme__n"/></e>
<e lm="barn">            <i>b</i><par n="b/arn__n"/></e>
<e lm="vidunderbarn">    <i>vidunderb</i><par n="b/arn__n"/></e>
<e lm="småbarn">         <i>småb</i><par n="b/arn__n"/></e>
<e lm="egoisme">         <i>egoisme</i><par n="sadisme__n"/></e>
<e lm="hjem">            <i>hjem</i><par n="hjem__n"/></e>
<e lm="lam">             <i>lam</i><par n="hjem__n"/></e>
<e lm="sadisme">         <i>sadisme</i><par n="sadisme__n"/></e>
<e lm="særtræk">         <i>særtræk</i><par n="stik__n"/></e>
<e lm="karaktertræk">    <i>karaktertræk</i><par n="stik__n"/></e>
<e lm="hak">             <i>hak</i><par n="stik__n"/></e>
<e lm="søn">             <i>søn</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
<e lm="skum">            <i>skum</i><par n="hjem__n"/></e>
<e lm="aftryk">          <i>aftryk</i><par n="stik__n"/></e>
<e lm="ansvar">          <i>ansvar</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="vand" c="en (soda)vand"><i>vand</i><par n="sodavand__n"/></e>
<e lm="kuldioxid">       <i>kuldioxid</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="telt">            <i>telt</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="zink">            <i>zink</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="medium" a="PT">   <i>medium</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="barnebarn">       <i>barneb</i><par n="b/arn__n"/></e>
<e lm="bildæk">          <i>bildæk</i><par n="stik__n"/></e>
<e lm="egeblad">         <i>egeblad</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="blik">            <i>blik</i><par n="blik__n"/></e>
<e lm="øjeblik">         <i>øjeblik</i><par n="blik__n"/></e>
<e lm="bestik">          <i>bestik</i><par n="stik__n"/></e>
<e lm="bly">             <i>bly</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="blæk">            <i>blæk</i><par n="stik__n"/></e>
<e lm="brænde">          <i>brænde</i><par n="mørke__n"/></e>
<e lm="bøn">             <i>bøn</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
<e lm="dagblad">         <i>dagblad</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="dæk">             <i>dæk</i><par n="stik__n"/></e>
<e lm="egern">           <i>egern</i><par n="egern__n"/></e>
<e lm="fylde">           <i>fylde</i><par n="sadisme__n"/></e>
<e lm="kirketårn">       <i>kirketårn</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="føde">            <i>føde</i><par n="sadisme__n"/></e>
<e lm="gram">            <i>gram</i><par n="hjem__n"/></e>
<e lm="hardware">        <i>hardware</i><par n="sadisme__n"/></e>
<e lm="helse">           <i>helse</i><par n="sadisme__n"/></e>
<e lm="hilsen">          <i>hils</i><par n="aft/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="hun">             <i>hun</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
<e lm="indblik">         <i>indblik</i><par n="blik__n"/></e>
<e lm="jod">             <i>jod</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="kilogram">        <i>kilogram</i><par n="hjem__n"/></e>
<e lm="fastland">        <i>fastland</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="lufttryk">        <i>lufttryk</i><par n="stik__n"/></e>
<e lm="læder">           <i>læder</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="mellemrum">       <i>mellemrum</i><par n="hjem__n"/></e>
<e lm="mørke">           <i>mørke</i><par n="mørke__n"/></e>
<e lm="peber">           <i>peber</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="rum">             <i>rum</i><par n="hjem__n"/></e>
<e lm="skab">            <i>skab</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="sodavand">        <i>sodavand</i><par n="sodavand__n"/></e>
<e lm="software">        <i>software</i><par n="sadisme__n"/></e>
<e lm="spædbarn">        <i>spædb</i><par n="b/arn__n"/></e>
<e lm="svigersøn">       <i>svigersøn</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
<e lm="sønnesøn">        <i>sønnesøn</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
<e lm="søm">             <i>søm</i><par n="hjem__n"/></e>
<e lm="tusmørke">        <i>tusmørke</i><par n="mørke__n"/></e>
<e lm="tværskib">        <i>tværskib</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="udtryk">          <i>udtryk</i><par n="stik__n"/></e>
<e lm="uldtøj">          <i>uldtøj</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="ven">             <i>ven</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
